Tennessee, session 114, HB0543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 35, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A city or town that has operated a sewerage system outside of the corporate
boundaries of the city or town for twenty-five (25) years or more shall not cease
operating the sewerage system outside the corporate boundaries so long as the
sewerage system maintains sufficient capacity, as determined by a study conducted by
the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 82, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A utility district that has operated a sewerage system in the unincorporated
territory of a county for twenty-five (25) years or more shall not cease operating the
sewerage system in the unincorporated territory so long as the sewerage system
maintains sufficient capacity, as determined by a study conducted by the Tennessee
advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 221, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A municipality that has operated a sewage treatment works outside of the
corporate boundaries of the city or town for twenty-five (25) years or more shall not
cease operating the sewage treatment works outside the corporate boundaries so long
HB0543
000581
- 1 -

as the sewage treatment works maintains sufficient capacity, as determined by a study
conducted by the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations
(TACIR).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000581